Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB191.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 199 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Cabinet" means the Cabinet for Health and Family Services;
(b) "Type I child-care center" means a child-care center licensed by the cabinet
to regularly provide child care services for:
1. Four (4) or more children in a nonresidential setting; or
2. Thirteen (13) or more children in a designated space separate from the
Page 1 of 5
SB019110.100 - 1724 - XXXX 3/4/2026 2:59 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 191/GA
primary residence of a licensee;
(c) "Type II child-care center" means a child-care center that is the primary
residence of the licensee in which child care is regularly provided for at
least seven (7) but not more than twelve (12) children, including children
related to the licensee; and
(d) "University" means the University of Kentucky.
(2) By August 1, 2026, the university shall establish and operate the Kentucky
Kindergarten Readiness Performance-Based Child Care Incentive Pilot Program,
which shall operate from August 1, 2027, until July 31, 2029.
(3) The pilot program shall:
(a) Determine how to provide performance-based incentives to diverse types of
early childhood education providers, child-care providers, and low-income
parents in order to increase the number of children in the Commonwealth
who are assessed as kindergarten ready;
(b) Determine how to best assess applicants and distribute moneys;
(c) Develop a written plan and implement assessment processes to determine
kindergarten readiness for children in the Commonwealth. The university
shall convene a working group to assist in the development of the written
plan and assessment processes;
(d) Ensure that participants in the pilot program represent geographically and
socioeconomically diverse areas of the Commonwealth;
(e) Evaluate the impact of performance-based incentives implemented through
the pilot program using a rigorous design framework that supports causal
inferences;
(f) Design, identify, and make available resources for parents to assist them in
preparing children for kindergarten readiness;
(g) Determine how to award funds, including but not limited to direct payments
Page 2 of 5
SB019110.100 - 1724 - XXXX 3/4/2026 2:59 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 191/GA
or refundable tax credits, to licensed Type I and Type II child-care centers;
cabinet-regulated early childhood education providers, certified child-care
homes, and registered providers; and single or married parents who qualify
for the child-care subsidy administered by the cabinet pursuant to KRS
199.8994. To be eligible for funds:
1. A provider or a home shall maintain services for infants and toddlers
at a ratio established by the Division of Child Care within the cabinet;
2. A provider or a home shall maintain and submit accurate and detailed
records of care for any child; and
3. A parent shall submit records to verify he or she meets the
requirements to receive child care subsidy funds under KRS 199.8994;
(h) Establish a standard for awarding a two thousand dollar ($2,000) one (1)
time award, including but not limited to direct payments or refundable tax
credits, per child once a child is designated by the assessment processes as
kindergarten ready as follows:
1. A full award to a licensed Type I or Type II child-care center or
cabinet-regulated early childhood education provider, certified child-
care home, or registered provider who meets the requirements of
paragraph (g) of this subsection if the kindergarten-ready child
received full-time services from the center or provider the two (2) years
prior to the assessment;
2. A full award to a single or married parent who meets the requirements
of paragraph (g) of this subsection if the kindergarten-ready child was
cared for in the home the two (2) years prior to the assessment,
regardless of the utilization of a babysitter;
3. A full award to a licensed Type I or Type II child-care center or
cabinet-regulated early childhood education provider, certified child-
Page 3 of 5
SB019110.100 - 1724 - XXXX 3/4/2026 2:59 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 191/GA
care home, or registered provider who meets the requirements of
paragraph (g) of this subsection if the child cannot be properly
assessed as a kindergarten-ready child because of a formal diagnosis
of a disability and the child received full-time services from the
provider the two (2) years prior to the assessment;
4. A half award to a licensed Type I or Type II child-care center or
cabinet-regulated early childhood education provider, certified child-
care home, or registered provider who meets the requirements of
paragraph (g) of this subsection if the kindergarten-ready child
received half-day services from the center and attended public
preschool the two (2) years prior to the assessment; and
5. Split awards may be granted to individuals or providers based on who
provided full-time services or cared for the child in the two (2) years
prior to the assessment; and
(i) Ensure compliance with federal regulations, including but not limited to the
Quality Rating and Improvement Systems as established under 45 C.F.R. pt.
98.
(4) By January 1, 2030, the university shall submit a report to the cabinet and the
Legislative Research Commission for referral to the Interim Joint Committees on
Families and Children, Education, and Appropriations and Revenue that:
(a) Details the findings of the pilot program;
(b) If the pilot program proves successful:
1. Identifies specific mechanisms for change, including but not limited to
educational curricula and family practices to best prepare preschool-
age children for kindergarten readiness;
2. Includes recommendations based on the pilot program's results for
optimizing performance-based child care incentives in the
Page 4 of 5
SB019110.100 - 1724 - XXXX 3/4/2026 2:59 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 191/GA
Commonwealth; and
3. Includes recommendations and potential obstacles for implementing
the program at scale;
(c) Details the assessment processes used to determine kindergarten readiness;
(d) Identifies the rates of kindergarten readiness at the end of the pilot
program; and
(e) Includes all data generated from the pilot program, which shall be made
available for public review and use in accordance with applicable federal,
state, and institutional review board policies.
Page 5 of 5
SB019110.100 - 1724 - XXXX 3/4/2026 2:59 PM GA